Tennessee, session 114, HB1748.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-10-419(j), is amended by deleting
subdivisions (2) and (3) and substituting:
(2) The person ordered to use an ignition interlock device shall provide the
selected provider and the clerk of the court that has jurisdiction over the person with:
(A) Documentation demonstrating that the person is either qualified to
receive or is receiving funds on the date the person was ordered to use the
device from at least one (1) of the sources listed in subdivision (h)(4); and
(B) An authorization and consent for the state treasurer to obtain or
access documentation or information from state or federal agencies verifying that
the person is either qualified to receive or is receiving funds on the date the
person was ordered to use the device from at least one (1) of the sources listed
in subdivision (h)(4).
(3) In addition to providing the information pursuant to subdivision (j)(1),
providers shall also provide:
(A) The state treasurer with the documentation and information
referenced in subdivision (j)(2), for persons ordered to use an ignition interlock
device; and
HB1748
011198
- 1 -

(B) The respective local government with the affidavit of indigency, and
other information considered by the court to determine whether the person is
indigent, for a person ordered to use an alternative device.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-10-419(j), is amended by adding
a new subdivision:
(4) In order to verify that a person is receiving or is eligible to receive funds from
at least one (1) of the sources listed in subdivision (h)(4), the state treasurer is
authorized to enter into memoranda of understanding with appropriate state agencies.
The appropriate state agencies, as identified by the state treasurer, shall fully cooperate
with the exchange of documentation or information, as permitted by applicable laws and
rules.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 011198